Hawaii statutes.
§383-3 Place of performance.
"Employment" includes an individual's entire service, performed
within or both within and without this State if:

(1) The service is localized in this State; or

(2) The service is not localized in any state but
some of the service is performed in this State and[:]

(A) The individual's base of operation, or, if
there is no base of operation, then the place from which such service is
directed or controlled, is in this State; or

(B) The individual's base of operation or place
from which the service is directed or controlled is not in any state in which
some part of the service is performed but the individual's residence is in this
State.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this
section, the term employment also includes all service performed after
June 30, 1946, by an officer or member of the crew of an American vessel
on or in connection with such vessel, provided that the operating office from
which the operations of the vessel operating on navigable waters within or within
and without the United States is ordinarily and regularly supervised, managed,
directed, and controlled, is within this State. [L 1939, c 219, §2(k)(2); am L
1941, c 304, §1, pt of subs 8; RL 1945, §4204; am L 1947, c 75, §1(2); RL 1955,
§93-3; HRS §383-3]

Revision Note

In paragraph (2), (A) and (B) reformatted as subparagraphs
(A) and (B) pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next